Louisiana, session 2026, HB282.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:291.2(B)(4) through (6) and (D) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§291.2. Criminal history; hiring decisions
* * *
B. When considering other types of criminal history records, an employer
shall make an individual assessment of whether an applicant's criminal history record
has a direct and adverse relationship with the specific duties of the job that may
justify denying the applicant the position. When making this assessment, an
employer shall consider all of the following:
* * *
(4) Any evidence of rehabilitation mitigation, including but not limited to
completion of educational or vocational training, employment history, or
participation in rehabilitative programs.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-896 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 282
(5) Whether the applicant was a juvenile at the time of the offense or
conduct.
(6) Whether a direct nexus exists between the job duties sought and the
nature of the offense or conduct.
* * *
D.(1) An applicant aggrieved by a violation of this Section may file a
complaint with the Louisiana Commission on Human Rights herein referred to as the
"commission".
(2) The commission shall investigate complaints, conduct hearings, and issue
findings of fact and determinations of compliance or noncompliance.
(3) If the commission determines that a violation has occurred, it shall order
appropriate relief in any of the following ways, including but not limited to:
(a) A cease and desist order.
(b) A corrective action related to the hiring process.
(c) A civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars per each violation.
(d) Any other relief authorized by law.
(4) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to create a private cause of
action.